Hawaii, session 2026, SB2771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to allow a person to provide an individual taxpayer identification number in lieu of a social security number in the person's application for a professional or vocational license within the department of commerce and consumer affairs, given that the person satisfies all other requirements to be licensed, is not violating any laws regarding employment, and can show proof of continued residence in the State. SECTION 2.  Section 436B-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§436B-10 Application and requirements for licensure.  (a) Application for a license shall be made on an application form to be furnished by the licensing authority.  An applicant shall provide the following information on the application form: (1)  The applicant's legal name; (2)  Affirmation that the applicant is beyond the age of majority; (3)  The applicant's current residence, business and mailing addresses, and phone numbers; (4)  The applicant's social security number or individual taxpayer identification number if the licensing authority is authorized by federal law to require the disclosure; (5)  The date and place of any conviction of a penal crime directly related to the profession or vocation in which the applicant is applying for licensure, unless the conviction has been expunged or annulled, or is otherwise precluded from consideration by section 831-3.1; [(6)  Proof that the applicant is a United States citizen, a United States national, or an alien authorized to work in the United States; (7)] (6) Disclosure of similar licensure in any state or territory; [(8)] (7) Disclosure of disciplinary action by any state or territory against any license held by the applicant; and [(9)] (8) Any other information the licensing authority may require to investigate the applicant's qualifications for licensure. Failure to provide the above information and pay the required fees shall be grounds to deny the application for licensure. (b)  In addition to any other requirements provided by law, all applicants shall [be]: (1)  [Beyond] Be beyond the age of majority; [and] (2)  [A United States citizen, a United States national, or an alien authorized to work in the United States.] Provide a social security number or individual taxpayer identification number; (3)  Prove continued physical residence in the State; and (4)  Satisfy all other requirements to be licensed." SECTION 3.  Section 467-9.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  No individual shall be eligible for the licensing examination unless the individual: (1)  Is [a United States citizen, a United States national, or an alien authorized to work in the United States;] able to provide a social security number or individual taxpayer identification number; (2)  Is of the age of majority; (3)  Has earned a high school diploma or its equivalent; and (4)  Is applying for: (A)  The real estate salesperson examination and has satisfactorily completed a commission-approved prelicensing course for real estate salesperson candidates, which includes real estate principles, or its equivalent as determined by the commission; or (B)  The real estate broker examination and: (i)  Holds a current, unencumbered Hawaii real estate salesperson license or a current, unencumbered real estate salesperson or broker license in another state or in a jurisdiction recognized by the Association of Real Estate License Law Officials, with an equivalent real estate licensing law as determined by the commission; (ii)  Has satisfactorily completed a commission-approved prelicensing course for real estate broker candidates, or its equivalent as determined by the commission; and (iii)  Has experience as a full-time Hawaii-licensed real estate salesperson associated with a Hawaii-licensed real estate broker for at least three years of the five-year period immediately prior to the submission of the experience certification application and has practical real estate salesperson experience, as certified by the principal broker, principal brokers, broker in charge, or brokers in charge, as the case may be, during the subject period.  The candidate shall secure commission approval of the candidate's experience certification application prior to the date of the examination.  Subject to commission approval, a candidate may request a determination of equivalency for the experience requirement based on real estate salesperson license experience or a current, unencumbered real estate broker license in another state, or in a jurisdiction recognized by the Association of Real Estate License Law Officials, with an equivalent real estate licensing law as determined by the commission." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________